trunk/resultats/hunspell/catalan.aff
PFX V N 60
PFX V 0 l' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX V 0 L' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX V 0 l' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX V 0 L' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX V 0 s' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX V 0 S' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX V 0 s' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX V 0 S' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX V a l'A a
PFX V a L'A a
PFX V a s'A a
PFX V a S'A a
PFX V à l'À à
PFX V à L'À à
PFX V à s'À à
PFX V à S'À à
PFX V e l'E e
PFX V e L'E e
PFX V e s'E e
PFX V e S'E e
PFX V è l'È è
PFX V è L'È è
PFX V è s'È è
PFX V è S'È è
PFX V é l'É é
PFX V é L'É é
PFX V é s'É é
PFX V é S'É é
PFX V i l'I i
PFX V i L'I i
PFX V i s'I i
PFX V i S'I i
PFX V í l'Í í
PFX V í L'Í í
PFX V í s'Í í
PFX V í S'Í í
PFX V o l'O o
PFX V o L'O o
PFX V o s'O o
PFX V o S'O o
PFX V ò l'Ò ò
PFX V ò L'Ò ò
PFX V ò s'Ò ò
PFX V ò S'Ò ò
PFX V ó l'Ó ó
PFX V ó L'Ó ó
PFX V ó s'Ó ó
PFX V ó S'Ó ó
PFX V u l'U u
PFX V u L'U u
PFX V u s'U u
PFX V u S'U u
PFX V ú l'Ú ú
PFX V ú L'Ú ú
PFX V ú s'Ú ú
PFX V ú S'Ú ú
PFX V h l'H h
PFX V h L'H h
PFX V h s'H h
PFX V h S'H h

PFX v Y 60
PFX v 0 l' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX v 0 L' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX v 0 l' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX v 0 L' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX v 0 s' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX v 0 S' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX v 0 s' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX v 0 S' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX v a l'A a
PFX v a L'A a
PFX v a s'A a
PFX v a S'A a
PFX v à l'À à
PFX v à L'À à
PFX v à s'À à
PFX v à S'À à
PFX v e l'E e
PFX v e L'E e
PFX v e s'E e
PFX v e S'E e
PFX v è l'È è
PFX v è L'È è
PFX v è s'È è
PFX v è S'È è
PFX v é l'É é
PFX v é L'É é
PFX v é s'É é
PFX v é S'É é
PFX v i l'I i
PFX v i L'I i
PFX v i s'I i
PFX v i S'I i
PFX v í l'Í í
PFX v í L'Í í
PFX v í s'Í í
PFX v í S'Í í
PFX v o l'O o
PFX v o L'O o
PFX v o s'O o
PFX v o S'O o
PFX v ò l'Ò ò
PFX v ò L'Ò ò
PFX v ò s'Ò ò
PFX v ò S'Ò ò
PFX v ó l'Ó ó
PFX v ó L'Ó ó
PFX v ó s'Ó ó
PFX v ó S'Ó ó
PFX v u l'U u
PFX v u L'U u
PFX v u s'U u
PFX v u S'U u
PFX v ú l'Ú ú
PFX v ú L'Ú ú
PFX v ú s'Ú ú
PFX v ú S'Ú ú
PFX v h l'H h
PFX v h L'H h
PFX v h s'H h
PFX v h S'H h

PFX W N 4
PFX W 0 n' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX W 0 l' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX W 0 N' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX W 0 L' [AÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]

PFX Y Y 28
PFX Y 0 d' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuúAÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX Y 0 D' [1aàeèéiíoòóhuúAÀEÈÉIÍOÒÓHUÚ]
PFX Y a d'A a
PFX Y a D'A a
PFX Y à d'À à
PFX Y à D'À à
PFX Y e d'E e
PFX Y e D'E e
PFX Y è d'È è
PFX Y è D'È è
PFX Y é d'É é
PFX Y é D'É é
PFX Y i d'I i
PFX Y i D'I i
PFX Y í d'Í í
PFX Y í D'Í í
PFX Y o d'O o
PFX Y o D'O o
PFX Y ò d'Ò ò
PFX Y ò D'Ò ò
PFX Y ó d'Ó ó
PFX Y ó D'Ó ó
PFX Y u d'U u
PFX Y u D'U u
PFX Y ú d'Ú ú
PFX Y ú D'Ú ú
PFX Y h d'H h
PFX Y h D'H h

PFX Z Y 5
PFX Z 0 n' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX Z 0 m' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX Z 0 t' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX Z 0 s' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
PFX Z 0 l' [aàeèéiíoòóhuú]
